Utah statutes.
17C-1-301.   Agency property exempt from taxation -- Exception.
(1)  Agency property acquired or held for purposes of this title is declared
to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and,
subject to Subsection (2), is exempt from all taxes of a public entity.
(2)  The exemption in Subsection (1) does not apply to property that the
agency leases to a lessee that is not entitled to a tax exemption with respect
to the property.
